updated/repository/apertium_hn_LC.dix
<pardef n="Sawru/__n">
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>oM</l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>					
<pardef n="katu/__n">
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>					
<pardef n="Al/U__n">
<e><p><l>U</l><r>U<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>U</l><r>U<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>U</l><r>U<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>uoM</l><r>U<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>					
<pardef n="lahU/__n">
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>					
<pardef n="ku/Az__n">
<e><p><l>Az</l><r>Az<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ez</l><r>Az<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ez</l><r>Az<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>oM</l><r>Az<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>					
<pardef n="redio/__n">
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>					
<pardef n="geh/Uz__n">
<e><p><l>Uz</l><r>Uz<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>Uz</l><r>Uz<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>Uz</l><r>Uz<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>uzoM</l><r>Uz<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>					
<pardef n="BARAvix/__n">
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>oM</l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>					
<pardef n="k/A__sh">
<e><p><l>A</l><r>A<s n="cat:sh"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>e</l><r>A<s n="cat:sh"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>e</l><r>A<s n="cat:sh"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>e</l><r>A<s n="cat:sh"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>I</l><r>A<s n="cat:sh"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>I</l><r>A<s n="cat:sh"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>I</l><r>A<s n="cat:sh"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>I</l><r>A<s n="cat:sh"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="ajAwaSawru"><i>ajAwaSawru</i><par n="katu/__n"/></e>
<e lm="amarapraBu"><i>amarapraBu</i><par n="katu/__n"/></e>
<e lm="amaraxAru"><i>amaraxAru</i><par n="katu/__n"/></e>
<e lm="aMSu"><i>aMSu</i><par n="Sawru/__n"/></e>
<e lm="araswU"><i>araswU</i><par n="lahU/__n"/></e>
<e lm="araviMxabaMXu"><i>araviMxabaMXu</i><par n="katu/__n"/></e>
<e lm="asaw"><i>asaw</i><par n="BARAvix/__n"/></e>
<e lm="ASramaguru"><i>ASramaguru</i><par n="Sawru/__n"/></e>
<e lm="asu"><i>asu</i><par n="katu/__n"/></e>
<e lm="avixvAn"><i>avixvAn</i><par n="BARAvix/__n"/></e>
<e lm="aXiBU"><i>aXiB</i><par n="Al/U__n"/></e>
<e lm="AXimanyu"><i>AXimanyu</i><par n="Sawru/__n"/></e>
<e lm="axriBU"><i>axriBU</i><par n="lahU/__n"/></e>
<e lm="bAbU"><i>bAb</i><par n="Al/U__n"/></e>
<e lm="BagavAn"><i>BagavAn</i><par n="BARAvix/__n"/></e>
<e lm="bAjU"><i>bAj</i><par n="Al/U__n"/></e>
<e lm="balavAn"><i>balavAn</i><par n="BARAvix/__n"/></e>
<e lm="balipaSu"><i>balipaSu</i><par n="Sawru/__n"/></e>
<e lm="baNik"><i>baNik</i><par n="BARAvix/__n"/></e>
<e lm="bAno"><i>bAno</i><par n="redio/__n"/></e>
<e lm="BAnu"><i>BAnu</i><par n="katu/__n"/></e>
<e lm="beAbarU"><i>beAbarU</i><par n="lahU/__n"/></e>
<e lm="bicCU"><i>bicC</i><par n="Al/U__n"/></e>
<e lm="bikAU"><i>bikAU</i><par n="lahU/__n"/></e>
<e lm="BogavAn"><i>BogavAn</i><par n="BARAvix/__n"/></e>
<e lm="BoMpU"><i>BoMp</i><par n="Al/U__n"/></e>
<e lm="BozpU"><i>Bozp</i><par n="Al/U__n"/></e>
<e lm="bqhax"><i>bqhax</i><par n="BARAvix/__n"/></e>
<e lm="brahmabaMXu"><i>brahmabaMXu</i><par n="Sawru/__n"/></e>
<e lm="buBuwsu"><i>buBuwsu</i><par n="katu/__n"/></e>
<e lm="buxXimAn"><i>buxXimAn</i><par n="BARAvix/__n"/></e>
<e lm="cakkU"><i>cakk</i><par n="Al/U__n"/></e>
<e lm="caMxrabiMxu"><i>caMxrabiMxu</i><par n="katu/__n"/></e>
<e lm="cattU"><i>catt</i><par n="Al/U__n"/></e>
<e lm="cAtu"><i>cAtu</i><par n="katu/__n"/></e>
<e lm="dAkU"><i>dAk</i><par n="Al/U__n"/></e>
<e lm="dipo"><i>dipo</i><par n="redio/__n"/></e>
<e lm="gehUz"><i>geh</i><par n="geh/Uz__n"/></e>
<e lm="go"><i>go</i><par n="redio/__n"/></e>
<e lm="grAmyapaSu"><i>grAmyapaSu</i><par n="Sawru/__n"/></e>
<e lm="GugGU"><i>GugG</i><par n="Al/U__n"/></e>
<e lm="hiMgu"><i>hiMgu</i><par n="Sawru/__n"/></e>
<e lm="hiMxU"><i>hiMx</i><par n="Al/U__n"/></e>
<e lm="hiraNyakaSipu"><i>hiraNyakaSipu</i><par n="katu/__n"/></e>
<e lm="hIro"><i>hIro</i><par n="redio/__n"/></e>
<e lm="iMtaravyU"><i>iMtaravyU</i><par n="lahU/__n"/></e>
<e lm="jadAU"><i>jadAU</i><par n="lahU/__n"/></e>
<e lm="JagadAlU"><i>JagadAl</i><par n="Al/U__n"/></e>
<e lm="jagaw"><i>jagaw</i><par n="BARAvix/__n"/></e>
<e lm="jaMwu"><i>jaMwu</i><par n="Sawru/__n"/></e>
<e lm="jarAyu"><i>jarAyu</i><par n="katu/__n"/></e>
<e lm="jAxU"><i>jAx</i><par n="Al/U__n"/></e>
<e lm="jUz"><i>jUz</i><par n="ku/Az__n"/></e>
<e lm="KadAUz"><i>KadA</i><par n="geh/Uz__n"/></e>
<e lm="kA"><i>k</i><par n="k/A__sh"/></e>
<e lm="kAjU"><i>kAj</i><par n="Al/U__n"/></e>
<e lm="kamAU"><i>kamAU</i><par n="lahU/__n"/></e>
<e lm="karaPyU"><i>karaPyU</i><par n="lahU/__n"/></e>
<e lm="karNakatu"><i>karNakatu</i><par n="katu/__n"/></e>
<e lm="karPyU"><i>karPyU</i><par n="lahU/__n"/></e>
<e lm="KAz"><i>K</i><par n="ku/Az__n"/></e>
<e lm="kewu"><i>kewu</i><par n="katu/__n"/></e>
<e lm="koko"><i>koko</i><par n="redio/__n"/></e>
<e lm="kqpAlu"><i>kqpAlu</i><par n="Sawru/__n"/></e>
<e lm="kuAz"><i>ku</i><par n="ku/Az__n"/></e>
<e lm="kuMxarU"><i>kuMxar</i><par n="Al/U__n"/></e>
<e lm="kuru"><i>kuru</i><par n="katu/__n"/></e>
<e lm="kUtU"><i>kUtU</i><par n="lahU/__n"/></e>
<e lm="lahU"><i>lahU</i><par n="lahU/__n"/></e>
<e lm="lakRmIvAn"><i>lakRmIvAn</i><par n="BARAvix/__n"/></e>
<e lm="lalacAU"><i>lalacAU</i><par n="lahU/__n"/></e>
<e lm="lattU"><i>latt</i><par n="Al/U__n"/></e>
<e lm="liMgavAn"><i>liMgavAn</i><par n="BARAvix/__n"/></e>
<e lm="mahApraBu"><i>mahApraBu</i><par n="katu/__n"/></e>
<e lm="mahawo"><i>mahawo</i><par n="redio/__n"/></e>
<e lm="mahimAvAn"><i>mahimAvAn</i><par n="BARAvix/__n"/></e>
<e lm="maMwravix"><i>maMwravix</i><par n="BARAvix/__n"/></e>
<e lm="mAwq"><i>mAwq</i><par n="BARAvix/__n"/></e>
<e lm="maXu"><i>maXu</i><par n="katu/__n"/></e>
<e lm="meru"><i>meru</i><par n="Sawru/__n"/></e>
<e lm="meXAvAn"><i>meXAvAn</i><par n="BARAvix/__n"/></e>
<e lm="miyAz"><i>miy</i><par n="ku/Az__n"/></e>
<e lm="narapaSu"><i>narapaSu</i><par n="Sawru/__n"/></e>
<e lm="neharU"><i>nehar</i><par n="Al/U__n"/></e>
<e lm="nIgro"><i>nIgro</i><par n="redio/__n"/></e>
<e lm="nIMbU"><i>nIMb</i><par n="Al/U__n"/></e>
<e lm="niScakRu"><i>niScakRu</i><par n="katu/__n"/></e>
<e lm="PAlawU"><i>PAlawU</i><par n="lahU/__n"/></e>
<e lm="paMdiwAU"><i>paMdiwAU</i><par n="lahU/__n"/></e>
<e lm="paraSu"><i>paraSu</i><par n="Sawru/__n"/></e>
<e lm="pariRax"><i>pariRax</i><par n="BARAvix/__n"/></e>
<e lm="patu"><i>patu</i><par n="katu/__n"/></e>
<e lm="paxmaBU"><i>paxmaBU</i><par n="lahU/__n"/></e>
<e lm="petU"><i>pet</i><par n="Al/U__n"/></e>
<e lm="PlU"><i>PlU</i><par n="lahU/__n"/></e>
<e lm="po"><i>po</i><par n="redio/__n"/></e>
<e lm="Poto"><i>Poto</i><par n="redio/__n"/></e>
<e lm="praBAvavAn"><i>praBAvavAn</i><par n="BARAvix/__n"/></e>
<e lm="praBu"><i>praBu</i><par n="katu/__n"/></e>
<e lm="prajFAcakRu"><i>prajFAcakRu</i><par n="Sawru/__n"/></e>
<e lm="prANavAn"><i>prANavAn</i><par n="BARAvix/__n"/></e>
<e lm="prayawnavAn"><i>prayawnavAn</i><par n="BARAvix/__n"/></e>
<e lm="pU"><i>p</i><par n="Al/U__n"/></e>
<e lm="punarBU"><i>punarBU</i><par n="lahU/__n"/></e>
<e lm="rAmasewu"><i>rAmasewu</i><par n="katu/__n"/></e>
<e lm="rAmaXanuR"><i>rAmaXanuR</i><par n="BARAvix/__n"/></e>
<e lm="raPU"><i>raPU</i><par n="lahU/__n"/></e>
<e lm="rAso"><i>rAso</i><par n="redio/__n"/></e>
<e lm="redio"><i>redio</i><par n="redio/__n"/></e>
<e lm="rediyo"><i>rediyo</i><par n="redio/__n"/></e>
<e lm="ripu"><i>ripu</i><par n="Sawru/__n"/></e>
<e lm="royAz"><i>roy</i><par n="ku/Az__n"/></e>
<e lm="sADU"><i>sAD</i><par n="Al/U__n"/></e>
<e lm="Sakrajiw"><i>Sakrajiw</i><par n="BARAvix/__n"/></e>
<e lm="SaMBu"><i>SaMBu</i><par n="katu/__n"/></e>
<e lm="SaMkuwaru"><i>SaMkuwaru</i><par n="Sawru/__n"/></e>
<e lm="sAsu"><i>sAsu</i><par n="Sawru/__n"/></e>
<e lm="sawaguru"><i>sawaguru</i><par n="katu/__n"/></e>
<e lm="saw"><i>saw</i><par n="BARAvix/__n"/></e>
<e lm="sawwU"><i>saww</i><par n="Al/U__n"/></e>
<e lm="SiKAlu"><i>SiKAlu</i><par n="Sawru/__n"/></e>
<e lm="SIwAMSu"><i>SIwAMSu</i><par n="Sawru/__n"/></e>
<e lm="So"><i>So</i><par n="redio/__n"/></e>
<e lm="SqMgavAn"><i>SqMgavAn</i><par n="BARAvix/__n"/></e>
<e lm="SraxXAlu"><i>SraxXAlu</i><par n="Sawru/__n"/></e>
<e lm="SrIwaru"><i>SrIwaru</i><par n="katu/__n"/></e>
<e lm="stUdiyo"><i>stUdiyo</i><par n="redio/__n"/></e>
<e lm="sucAru"><i>sucAru</i><par n="katu/__n"/></e>
<e lm="tAlU"><i>tAlU</i><par n="lahU/__n"/></e>
<e lm="tikAU"><i>tikA</i><par n="Al/U__n"/></e>
<e lm="tikaU"><i>tikaU</i><par n="lahU/__n"/></e>
<e lm="udAU"><i>udAU</i><par n="lahU/__n"/></e>
<e lm="ukadU"><i>ukadU</i><par n="lahU/__n"/></e>
<e lm="upajAU"><i>upajAU</i><par n="lahU/__n"/></e>
<e lm="uragaSawru"><i>uragaSawru</i><par n="Sawru/__n"/></e>
<e lm="uTAU"><i>uTAU</i><par n="lahU/__n"/></e>
<e lm="vaXu"><i>vaXu</i><par n="Sawru/__n"/></e>
<e lm="vAyu"><i>vAyu</i><par n="katu/__n"/></e>
<e lm="virAt"><i>virAt</i><par n="BARAvix/__n"/></e>
<e lm="viRNu"><i>viRNu</i><par n="Sawru/__n"/></e>
<e lm="wAlU"><i>wAl</i><par n="Al/U__n"/></e>
<e lm="wamas"><i>wamas</i><par n="BARAvix/__n"/></e>
<e lm="waru"><i>waru</i><par n="Sawru/__n"/></e>
<e lm="wAU"><i>wA</i><par n="Al/U__n"/></e>
<e lm="xamaAlU"><i>xamaAl</i><par n="Al/U__n"/></e>
<e lm="xAru"><i>xAru</i><par n="Sawru/__n"/></e>
<e lm="xAU"><i>xAU</i><par n="lahU/__n"/></e>
<e lm="xayAlu"><i>xayAlu</i><par n="Sawru/__n"/></e>
<e lm="Xruvakewu"><i>Xruvakewu</i><par n="katu/__n"/></e>
<e lm="XuAz"><i>Xu</i><par n="ku/Az__n"/></e>
<e lm="xyu"><i>xyu</i><par n="Sawru/__n"/></e>
<e lm="yUnesko"><i>yUnesko</i><par n="redio/__n"/></e>
<e lm="yUz"><i>yUz</i><par n="ku/Az__n"/></e>
